Utah statutes.
70A-7a-503.   Document of title to goods defeated in certain cases.
(1)  A document of title confers no right in goods against a person that
before issuance of the document had a legal interest or a perfected security
interest in the goods and that did not:
(a)  deliver or entrust the goods or any document of title covering the goods
to the bailor or the bailor's nominee with:
(i)  actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;
(ii)  power to obtain delivery under Section 70A-7a-403; or
(iii)  power of disposition under Section 70A-2-403, Subsection 70A-2a-304(2),
Subsection 70A-2a-305(2), Section 70A-9a-320, or Subsection 70A-9a-321(3) or
other statute or rule of law; or
(b)  acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of any
document.
(2)  Title to goods based upon an unaccepted delivery order is subject to the
rights of any person to which a negotiable warehouse receipt or bill of lading
covering the goods has been duly negotiated.  That title may be defeated under
Section 70A-7a-504 to the same extent as the rights of the issuer or a
transferee from the issuer.
(3)  Title to goods based upon a bill of lading issued to a freight forwarder
is subject to the rights of any person to which a bill issued by the freight
forwarder is duly negotiated.  However, delivery by the carrier in accordance
with Part 4, Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: General Obligations,
pursuant to its own bill of lading discharges the carrier's obligation to
deliver.
